New York, session 2025-2026, A512.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Title 21-A of the administrative code of the city of New 2 York is amended by adding a new chapter 23-A to read as follows: 3 CHAPTER 23-A 4 LEADERSHIP TEAMS 5 § 21-990.1 Open meetings law requirement. All district leadership 6 teams shall operate pursuant to article seven of the public officers 7 law. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 9 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 10 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 11 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 12 on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01951-01-5